Tennessee statutes. Title 10 Public Libraries, Archives and Records
Part 5 Miscellaneous Provisions
Foster care, confidentiality of records obtained for human service's annual report, § 37-2-411.

Foster care proceedings, confidentiality of records, § 37-2-408.

Foster care, review board records, § 37-2-408.

Hazardous waste management, confidentiality of information, § 68-212-109.

Health care liability claims data, use of, § 56-54-102.

Health care liability settlement excesses, confidentiality of insurance company reports, § 56-3-111.

Health Care Service Utilization Review Act, confidentiality, § 56-6-702.

Health care service utilization review agents, § 56-6-705.

Health insurance entities, confidentiality of individual medical information, § 68-1-108.

Health maintenance organization, amounts paid to, fee schedules, salaries, etc., § 56-32-130.

High volume prescribers of controlled substances, § 68-1-128.

HIV testing, confidentiality of test results, § 39-13-521.

HIV testing of inmates, § 41-21-107.

Home address confidentiality program, §§ 40-38-601—40-38-613.

Hospital records as evidence, title 68, ch. 11, part 4.

Hospital records not public records, § 68-11-304.

Identity of individual who reports or participates in department of children's services safety reporting system, § 37-5-106(a)(22).

Identity of insured or insured's financial or medical information for purposes of viatical settlements, §§ 56-50-106, 56-50-107.

Identity of person who reports abuse, exploitation, fraud, neglect, or mistreatment to various departments, § 33-3-108.

Identifying information concerning a victim of child sexual abuse, § 29-34-103.

Illegal use of lists of persons applying for or receiving aid to the permanently and totally disabled, § 71-1-1114.

Implement the federal Drivers' Privacy Protection Act of 1994, § 55-25-102.

Improper use of names of recipients of medical assistance, § 71-2-308.

Individual returns and tax information where release of information would identify a confidential informant or seriously impair a civil or criminal tax investigation, § 67-1-1704.

Individual taxpayer's confidential financial information under Tennessee Taxpayer's Bill of Rights, § 67-1-110.

Infectious diseases, medical laboratory reports, confidentiality, § 68-29-107.

Information as to identification and tracking of students with active duty military or reserve parents or guardians, § 49-6-5101.

Information from an investigation conducted by the department of health concerning the authority of any provider of any emergency medical services, § 68-140-314.

Information furnished by the department of commerce and insurance to national association of insurance commissioners concerning regulatory information system ratios and listings of companies not included in the ratios, § 56-12-211.

Information held by HMO pertaining to diagnosis, treatment or health of enrollee, § 56-32-125.

Information identifying persons covered by third parties for medical services, § 71-5-117.

Information in the Tennessee ethics commission electronic filing system, § 3-6-115.

Information, materials, documents compiled by the department of commerce and insurance during examination of a county mutual insurance company, § 56-22-115.

Information obtained by claimant agency from Tennessee Education Lottery Corporation regarding debts, § 4-51-205.

Information obtained by the department of commerce and insurance concerning investigations of any health maintenance organization or person providing services under TennCare, § 56-32-135.

Information obtained by the department of commerce and insurance for the purposes of terminating the appointment, employment or contract or other insurance business relationship with a producer, § 56-6-117.

Information obtained by the department of revenue from the insurance verification program, § 55-12-209.

Information obtained during commissioner's examinations of charitable organization assets, liabilities and affairs, § 56-52-107.

Information obtained from the taxation of unauthorized substances, § 67-4-2808.

Information on human rights commission in conciliation agreements, § 4-21-303.

Information pertaining to the diagnosis, treatment or health of any enrollee of a prepaid limited health service organization or any state investigation of such organization by law enforcement, regulatory, licensing or other governmental agency for purposes of prosecuting or preventing insurance fraud, § 56-51-150.

Information provided by TNInvestcos as part of annual review, § 4-28-111.

Information provided to the department of economic and community development by qualified TNInvestcos as to documentary support for all proceeds and distributions related to liquidity events, § 4-28-108.

Information provided to the department of finance and administration by TNInvestcos to support the state's profit share percentage, § 4-28-109.

Information received by dairy industry by the Southern Dairy Compact commission, § 43-35-106.

Information related to school security, § 49-6-804.

Information submitted to or generated by authorities detecting, prosecuting or preventing insurance fraud, § 56-52-109.

Information submitted to or generated by law enforcement or insurance department for the purposes of detecting or prosecuting insurance fraud, § 56-53-109.

Information that might reveal the identities of the patient of an ambulatory surgical treatment center, § 68-1-119.

Inmate exposure to disease, confidentiality of records, § 41-51-102.

Inmates in private prison facilities, confidentiality of records, § 41-24-117.

Inspection of persons or entities providing child care, § 71-3-508.

Inspection of records of persons or entities providing childcare, § 49-1-1106.

Institutions of higher education, consent forms relative to confidential education records, § 47-7-1103.

Insurance department files and court records and papers in proceedings and judicial reviews of insurance companies, § 56-9-202.

Insurance examinations, confidentiality of records, § 56-1-411.

Insurance holding companies, confidentiality, §§ 56-11-103, 56-11-104, 56-11-108.

Insurer's material transactions and reports to commission, § 56-10-301.

Insurers' material transactions, reports, § 56-10-301.

Intercollegiate atheltics program records, § 49-7-170.

Interstate Insurance Product Commission, confidentiality of work papers related to audits, and individuals' and insurers' proprietary information, § 56-58-102.

Investigative and disciplinary processes involving medical practitioners, § 63-6-214.

Investigative files relevant to criminal actions, confidentiality, Tenn. R. Crim. P. 16.

Investigative record of officer-involved shooting death, public record, § 38-8-311.

Investigative records relating to potential criminal prosecutions of persons for violation of the tax laws, § 67-1-1705.

Jury book, § 22-2-302.

Juvenile court record confidentiality, §§ 37-1-153, 37-1-506.

Juvenile law enforcement record confidentiality, § 37-1-154.

Landlord not authorized to obtain confidential or protected medical records or confidential or protected medical information concerning a tenant or prospective tenant’s disability, §§ 66-7-111, 66-28-406.

Legal services office, confidentiality of records, § 3-12-105.

Legislative computer system, confidentiality of information, § 3-10-108.

Legislative legal services communications with general assembly members, § 3-12-106.

Library records, § 10-8-102.

Library records, confidentiality, title 10, chapters 1, 3-5 and 8.

Licensure for professional contests of unarmed combat, § 68-115-206.

Limitation on confidentiality on reports of alleged falsification, waste, or mismanagement of public education funds, § 49-50-1408.

Limited partners right to information, § 61-2-304.

Local government instances of fraud, confidentiality of reports, § 8-4-505.

Lottery intelligence sharing with government, § 4-51-125.

Maintenance of confidential information securely by treasurer, see 66-29-181.

Manner of executing sentence of death, § 40-23-116.

Master social workers, privileged communications, § 63-23-109.

Medical and financial records of nursing home patients and their right to keep their such records confidential, § 68-11-910.

Medical information in viatical settlement contracts, § 56-50-110.

Medical malpractice claims data, confidentiality, § 56-54-107.

Meetings of audit committees, § 4-35-108.

Meetings of information systems council where some subject matter confidential, § 4-3-5509.

Meetings — Records — Business Plans — Governmental Immunity, § 11-25-109.

Money order issuers, confidentiality of reports of investigations and examinations, § 45-7-216.

Money order issues, reports, § 45-7-216.

Multi-level response system — Independent local advisory board, § 37-5-607.

Names of persons determined to have abused, neglected, or misappropriated the property of vulnerable individuals, § 68-11-1001.

Notice of release of certain felons from correctional facilities, § 41-21-242.

Notice reporting reprimands to speakers of the senate and house of representative — Notice a public record, § 17-5-208.

Notification of shipments of highly radioactive material, § 65-15-114.

Notification to victims of inmate's release, § 41-21-240.

Notifying victim of rights, § 40-38-111.

Occupational health and safety violations and enforcement, confidentiality, §§ 50-3-304, 50-3-504, 50-3-914.

Office of program evaluation, confidentiality of work papers, § 3-14-109.

On site technical assistance provided to hazardous waste generators, § 68-212-205.

On-line voter registration system, unique identifier , § 2-2-112.

Open records regarding construction services provider registration and workers' compensation exemption registration, § 50-6-915.

Operator and interpreter's privilege, § 24-1-210.

ORSA summary reports and other ORSA-related documents filed by insurers and health maintenance organizations with insurance commissioner, §§ 56-11-201, 56-11-208.

Parole, § 40-28-505.

Parolee records, confidentiality, § 40-28-119.

Patient confidentiality, § 68-11-1503.

Patient identity information collected and analyzed for the birth defects registry for the department of health, § 68-5-506.

Patient's Privacy Protection Act, title 68, ch. 11, part 15.

Patient specific information relating to interstate sharing of cancer reporting, § 68-1-1010.

Payroll records, confidentiality, § 12-4-414.

Penalties for Class A and B misdemeanors, § 40-35-111.

Personal information of victims of domestic abuse, § 37-1-151.

Physical therapist records, confidentiality, § 63-13-317.

Penalty for divulging property tax information furnished to local authorities, § 67-5-401.

Personal property taxation, confidentiality of information filed with state and local officials, § 67-5-402.

Physical Therapy Licensure Compact; meetings of the commission; data system, § 63-13-402.

Pilot program for patients to receive assisted outpatient treatment, § 33-6-624.

Pre-1951 original birth certificates in adoption cases in custody of department of health, § 68-3-313.

Preservation of records, § 67-5-1326.

Preservation of the secrecy of trade secrets that otherwise would be filed or submitted to the court, § 47-25-1706.

Prevention of court personnel from revealing secrets of jury commissioner proceedings, § 22-2-102.

Priority of pregnant women referred for drug abuse or dependence treatment, § 33-10-104.

Privacy or confidentiality of any information or material provided to a multi-state automated licensing system, § 45-7-229.

Privacy or confidentiality of shared information, §§ 45-5-209, 45-15-123, 45-18-124, 56-37-118.

Privileged and confidential information in business and industrial development corporations, § 45-8-221.

Professions of the healing arts, confidentiality, § 63-22-114.

Profit sharing or salary reduction plans, confidentiality of medical records, § 8-25-307.

Prohibited disclosure of confidential and proprietary information in connection with hospital cooperative agreements, § 68-11-1310.

Promotion of more effective regulation and reduction of regulatory burden through supervisory information sharing, § 45-17-122.

Proportionate representation of minority and nonminority groups on appointed boards, § 10-7-607.

Protection of records related to alternative investments, § 49-7-165.

Protection orders, title 36, ch. 3, part 6.

Protective orders, confidentiality of records, § 36-3-604.

Psychologists, peer review committees, confidentiality, § 63-11-220.

Public obligations, confidentiality of identity of owner, § 9-19-109.

Public Records Commission, title 10, ch. 7, part 3.

Public records having commercial value, § 10-7-506.

Public records of child care broker services, § 71-3-513.

Public service commission regulation of railways, confidentiality, § 65-3-109.

RBC reports, § 56-46-208.

Real estate insurance, confidentiality of information, § 47-23-101.

Records, correspondence, reports, and proceedings relating to supervision of insurers in the possession of the commissioner of commerce and insurance, § 56-9-504.

Records of convictions of traffic and other violations, § 10-7-507.

Records of delinquency proceedings, § 56-9-202.

Records of inmates, § 4-6-140.

Records of proceedings involving healthcare professionals, freedom of information, confidentiality of disciplinary proceedings, § 63-1-117.

Records or data reported or obtained pursuant to a subpoena issued in investigations of offenses of sexual exploitation of a minor, § 40-17-125.

Records or papers in secretary of state's office relating to executive department and requiring secrecy, § 8-3-104.

Records relating to inmates in private facilities, § 41-24-117.

Records required to be kept by emergency services licensees and permittees, § 68-140-319.

Redaction of social security on voter registration records, § 2-2-127.

Redaction of social security numbers from military records, § 58-4-103.

Regulation of confidential information regarding pesticide sale or use, § 62-21-129.

Regulatory rating assigned to a bank by the department of financial institutions, § 45-2-614.

Release of confidential information from database regarding controlled substance monitoring, § 53-10-308.

Release of information to family members and other designated persons, § 33-3-109.

Release of medical records to patient or representative, § 63-2-101.

Release of personal consumer information, § 47-18-2107.

Report from joint commission on accreditation of hospitals deemed confidential record, § 68-11-210.

Report to comptroller of treasury of government fraud, § 8-4-119.

Reporting case statistics — Automated court information system, § 16-1-117.

Reporting of brutality, abuse, neglect or child sexual abuse — Notification to parents of abuse on school grounds or under school supervision, § 37-1-403.

Reporting of suspected child abuse or child sexual abuse, § 49-6-1601.

Reporting requirements for public charter schools, § 49-13-120.

Reporting to local law enforcement by a qualified mental health professional or behavior analyst of an actual threat of serious bodily harm or death against an identifiable victim, § 33-3-210.

Reporting to local law enforcement by inpatient treatment facility of involuntary commitment of service recipient, § 33-3-117.

Reports of abuse or neglect, § 71-6-103.

Reports of known or suspected child sexual abuse — Investigations, § 37-1-605.

Reports of patients with traumatic brain injury, § 68-55-204.

Request for redaction of social security number from official records, § 58-4-103.

Requests by governor or supreme court chief justice for investigative records for background checks of appointees, § 38-6-106.

Research and development at University of Tennessee, title 49, chapter 9, part 14.

Results of criminal history records check for lottery CEO, § 4-51-109.

Results of criminal history records check for lottery director, § 4-51-103.

Results of criminal records check/TBI investigation for lottery employees, § 4-51-110.

Results of HIV testing, § 39-13-112.

Returns and tax information filed electronically with the department of revenue, § 67-1-703.

Returns and tax information filed with or in the possession of the commissioner of revenue, § 67-2-108.

Review and record of notifications, investigations and reports by comptroller, § 8-4-406.

Right of patients of a nursing home to keep their personal records confidential, §§ 68-11-804, § 68-11-901.

Rights of crime victims, notification, § 40-38-103.

Risk-based capital reports, confidentiality, § 56-46-109.

Rules relating to disclosure of confidential information, § 33-3-107.

Safeguards and procedures for ensuring that confidential information protected on laptop computers and other removable storage devices, § 47-18-2901.

Sealing of records related to adoption, § 36-1-126.

Securities act violations, confidentiality, § 48-1-118.

Sexually transmitted diseases, confidentiality of information, § 68-10-113.

Sharing of non-confidential data regarding medical license renewal, § 63-6-210.

State, county, and municipal records generally open for inspection, § 10-7-503.

State employment, background checks, § 8-50-112.

Statutory rape, reports, § 38-1-304.

Storage of confidential patient records, § 63-8-125.

Stored value cards, § 39-14-113.

Student achievement tests and answers, confidentiality, §§ 49-1-302, 49-6-6001.

Student data maintained by department of education, § 49-1-1203.

Student records, exclusion of child's offenses, § 49-6-3051.

Submission of list of adopted policies by agencies, § 4-5-230.

Submission of information, § 67-4-2604.

Supervisor, mineral test holes, confidentiality of information, §§ 60-1-504, 60-1-505.

Taxpayer statements, reports, returns, audits, etc., confidentiality, § 67-4-722.

Teen court proceedings records, § 37-1-705.

Telephone company records, § 24-7-116.

Tennessee Education Lottery Implementation Law, confidential information, § 4-51-124.

Tennessee ethics commission proceedings related to preliminary investigation, § 3-6-202.

Tennessee Professional Employer Organization Act, title 62, ch. 43.

Tennessee Serious and Violent Sex Offender Monitoring Pilot Project Act, title 40, ch. 39, part 3.

Testing of students for drugs, § 49-6-4213.

The identity of any person who provides evidence or other information that results in an eviction in premises knowingly used in violation of criminal statutes prohibiting drug use and prostitution, § 66-7-107.

Third party access to information pursuant to provider's health care services and contractual discounts, § 56-60-105.

Transfer of documents from criminal cases to not-for-profit depositories, § 10-7-510.

Transition plan where treatment program believes child leaving treatment poses threat of serious harm, § 49-6-3114.

Transmission of sports information for purposes of sports wagering, § 4-51-330.

Treasurer’s confidentiality agreements, see 66-29-179.

Unfair competition, confidentiality of records and testimony, § 56-8-107.

Uniform Motor Vehicle Records Disclosure Act, title 55, ch. 25.

Unlawful use of lists of old-age assistance recipients, § 71-2-214.

Unlawful use of lists of persons applying for or receiving aid to the blind, § 71-1-115.

Unsealing subpoenaed educational records, § 49-50-1505.

Victim's communications with magistrate concerning GPS monitoring and restrictions on defendant's movements not confidential, § 40-11-152.

Victim's right to notification of proceedings, § 40-38-110.

Vital records, confidentiality, § 68-3-205.

Voter's proof of citizenship, confidentiality of documentation and records relevant to establishing, § 2-2-141.

Waste reduction progress report not a public record, §§ 68-212-306, 68-212-311.

Water quality, oil and gas control enforcement, confidentiality, § 69-3-113.

Welfare recipient lists, confidentiality, § 71-1-118.

Workers' compensation, insurance company financial statements, confidentiality, § 50-6-405.

Working papers of internal audit staff not open records, § 4-3-304.

Workplace chemical lists or safety data sheets received by persons from fire chief, § 50-3-2001.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Rule 34 of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Tennessee.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 14 Tenn. Juris., Hospitals, § 2.

Tennessee Law of Evidence (2nd ed., Cohen, Paine and Sheppeard), § 501.10.

Law Reviews.

Bid Protests in Tennessee (Steven W. Feldman), 34 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 27 (1998).

The Tennessee Public Records Act and Statutory Exceptions “Otherwise Provided by State Law” (Craig E. Willis), 43 Tenn B.J. 20 (2007).

Updating Tennessee's Public Records Law (Douglas Pierce), 24 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 24 (1988).

Closing the Crime Victims Coverage Gap: Protecting Victims’ Private Records from Public Disclosure Following Tennessean v. Metro, 11 Tenn. J. L. & Pol'y 129 (2016).

Your Right to Look Like an Ugly Criminal: Resolving the Circuit Split over Mug Shots and the Freedom of Information Act, 66 Vand. L. Rev. 1573 (2013).

Attorney General Opinions. Release of unpublished information under subsection (e) permitted, OAG 98-094, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 94 (4/28/98).

Confidentiality of 911 tapes used in pending criminal investigation, OAG 99-022, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 29 (2/9/99).

Confidentiality of university student disciplinary records, OAG 99-106, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 106 (5/10/99).

Confidentiality of public employee's drug-free workplace program records in personnel records, OAG 99-126, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 127 (6/29/99).

The Tennessee Public Records Act requires public disclosure of the names, addresses, and ages of area non-public school students that are in the hands of a public school system pursuant to T.C.A. § 49-6-3007, and the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act would not deny federal funds to schools using this data to advertise their magnet schools to students in area private, parochial, and denominational schools, OAG 01-101, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 92 (6/22/01).

Neither the Public Records Act, T.C.A. §§ 10-7-503 and 10-7-504, nor T.C.A. § 4-4-125 governs the other; instead the latter statute creates an exception to the former statutes, OAG 02-016, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 17 (2/6/02).

The 2003 amendment of this section by ch. 105 does not make student records public and open for inspection; the amendment does grant a higher education institution discretionary authority to disclose some otherwise confidential student information and establishes the conditions of disclosure, OAG 03-139, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 158 (10/27/03).

The 2003 amendment of this section by ch. 105 governs all of the specified student records, regardless of the date when the records were created, OAG 03-139, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 158 (10/27/03).

In instances of conflict between the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act and the Tennessee Public Records Act, the federal law controls, OAG 03-139, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 158 (10/27/03).

Applicability of the Public Records Act to records of a county economic development agency, OAG 07-170, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 170 (12/21/07).

Confidentiality of hotel/motel and gross receipts tax information. OAG 12-20, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (2/22/12).

Release of Health Insurance Information for Members of the Tennessee General Assembly. OAG 15-48, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 51 (6/5/15).

Availability of student directory information. OAG 15-55, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 55 (7/2/15).

A city council with subpoena power under its charter does not have the authority to issue a subpoena for investigative records of the Tennessee Bureau of Investigation. OAG 15-65, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 65 (8/25/15).

In general, a district attorney turning over information to defense counsel pursuant to a mandate from the court will not be liable for the disclosure of confidential or privileged information. OAG 18-01, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 1 (1/4/2018).